Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1909
Refusal to file document; appeal.

(a) If the Secretary of State refuses to file a document delivered for filing to the Secretary of State's office, the domestic or foreign corporation may appeal the refusal to the district court of Lancaster County. The appeal is commenced by petitioning the court to compel filing the document and by attaching to the petition the document and the Secretary of State's explanation for the refusal to file.

(b) The district court may summarily order the Secretary of State to file the document or take other action the court considers appropriate.

(c) The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 9.